Tennessee, session 114, HB1715.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 22-1-103, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
( ) A mother who is breastfeeding a child is excused from jury service upon
providing the court with a supporting medical statement from a licensed physician. The
jury coordinator of the county shall excuse a mother who is breastfeeding a child from
jury service upon receiving a written request to be excused and a supporting medical
statement from a licensed physician.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1715
011283
- 1 -